Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7802
Representative of state.

The Director of Insurance is hereby designated to serve as the representative of this state to the Interstate Insurance Product Regulation Commission.

Laws 2005, LB 119, § 37.